Hawaii statutes.
[§662-19] Limited liability for
skateboarding activities in public skateboard parks. (a) No public entity
or public employee shall be liable to any person for injury or damage sustained
when using a public skateboard park, except when injury or damage is caused by
a condition resulting from the public entity's failure to maintain or repair
the skateboard park.

(b) Public entities that own or maintain
public skateboard parks shall maintain a record of all known or reported
injuries incurred by skateboard users in a public skateboard park and all
claims paid for such injuries and shall submit a report to the legislature on
or before twenty days before the convening of the 2008 legislative session,
along with any recommendations regarding the need for further immunity from
liability. [L 2003, c 144, §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next